District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.05

Obstruction of inspection prohibited.

No person shall neglect, fail, or refuse to exhibit any weight, scale, beam, measure, weighing or measuring device, subject to inspection or test under the provisions of this subchapter, to the Director or any of his assistants or inspectors for the purpose of inspection and test and no persons shall in any manner obstruct, hinder, or molest the Director or any of his assistants, inspectors, or other employees in the performance of their duties.

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1218, ch. 118, § 5
Apr. 11, 1946, 60 Stat. 88, ch. 134, § 1
1981 Ed., § 10-106.
1973 Ed., § 10-105.
Department of Weights, Measures and Markets abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 37-201.01.